sl-SI: Razred uspešnosti jadralnega letala: 15-metrski razred; 18-metrski razred; 20-metrski razred; Klubski razred; Odprti razred; Športni razred; Standardni razred (15 m); Dvosedežni razred; Ultralahki razred; Svetovni razred; Drugo
ru: Класс производительности планера: 15-метровый класс; 18-метровый класс; 20-метровый класс; Клубный класс; Открытый класс; Спортивный класс; Стандартный класс (15 м); Двухместный класс; Ультралегкий класс; Мировой класс; Другое
ja: グライダーパフォーマンスクラス: 15 m クラス; 18 m クラス; 20 m クラス; クラブクラス; オープンクラス; スポーツクラス; スタンダードクラス (15 m); 複座クラス; ウルトラライトクラス; ワールドクラス; その他
pl: Klasa wydajności szybowca: Klasa 15 m; Klasa 18 m; Klasa 20 m; Klasa klubowa; Klasa otwarta; Klasa sportowa; Klasa standardowa (15 m); Klasa dwumiejscowa; Klasa ultralekka; Klasa światowa; Inna
zh-CN: 滑翔机性能等级: 15 米级; 18 米级; 20 米级; 俱乐部级; 开放级; 运动级; 标准级（15 米）; 双座级; 超轻级; 世界级; 其他
hu: Siklóernyő teljesítményosztálya: 15 m-es osztály; 18 m-es osztály; 20 m-es osztály; Klub osztály; Nyílt osztály; Sport osztály; Standard osztály (15 m); Kétüléses osztály; Ultrakönnyű osztály; Világ osztály; Egyéb
fi: Purjelentokoneen suorituskykyluokka: 15 metrin luokka; 18 metrin luokka; 20 metrin luokka; Kerholuokka; Avoin luokka; Urheiluluokka; Vakioluokka (15 m); Kaksipaikkaisluokka; Ultrakevyt luokka; World Class; Muu
ko: 글라이더 성능 클래스: 15m 클래스; 18m 클래스; 20m 클래스; 클럽 클래스; 오픈 클래스; 스포츠 클래스; 표준 클래스(15m); 2인승 클래스; 초경량 클래스; 월드 클래스; 기타
ro-RO: Clasa de performanță a planorului: Clasa 15 m; Clasa 18 m; Clasa 20 m; Clasa Club; Clasa Open; Clasa Sport; Clasa Standard (15 m); Clasa cu două locuri; Clasa ultraușor; Clasa mondială; Altele
hr-HR: Klasa učinkovitosti jedrilice: Klasa od 15 m; Klasa od 18 m; Klasa od 20 m; Klupska klasa; Otvorena klasa; Sportska klasa; Standardna klasa (15 m); Klasa dvosjeda; Ultralaka klasa; Svjetska klasa; Ostalo
it: Classe di prestazioni per aliante: Classe 15 m; Classe 18 m; Classe 20 m; Classe club; Classe libera; Classe sport; Classe standard (15 m); Classe biposto; Classe ultraleggero; World class; Altro
zh-TW: 滑翔機性能級別: 15 公尺級; 18 公尺級; 20 公尺級; 俱樂部級; 開放級; 運動級; 標準級 (15 公尺); 雙座級; 超輕型級; 世界級; 其他
el: Κατηγορία απόδοσης ανεμοπτέρου: Κατηγορία 15 μ.; Κατηγορία 18 μ.; Κατηγορία 20 μ.; Κατηγορία Club; Ανοιχτή κατηγορία; Αθλητική κατηγορία; Τυπική κατηγορία (15 μ.); Κατηγορία διθέσιου; Κατηγορία υπερελαφρών; Κατηγορία World; Άλλο
pt-BR: Classe de desempenho do parapente: Classe 15 m; Classe 18 m; Classe 20 m; Classe clube; Classe aberta; Classe esportiva; Classe padrão (15 m); Classe biplace; Classe ultraleve; Classe mundial; Outra
lt-LT: Sklandytuvo našumo klasė: 15 m klasė; 18 m klasė; 20 m klasė; Klubinė klasė; Atviroji klasė; Sportinė klasė; Standartinė klasė (15 m); Dviviečių klasė; Itin lengvų sklandytuvų klasė; Pasaulinė klasė; Kita
pt-PT: Classe de desempenho de planador: Classe de 15 m; Classe de 18 m; Classe de 20 m; Classe de clube; Classe aberta; Classe de desporto; Classe standard (15 m); Classe de dois lugares; Classe de ultraleves; Classe mundial; Outra
tr: Planör performans sınıfı: 15 m sınıfı; 18 m sınıfı; 20 m sınıfı; Kulüp sınıfı; Açık sınıf; Spor sınıfı; Standart sınıf (15 m); İki koltuklu sınıfı; Ultra hafif sınıfı; Dünya sınıfı; Diğer
fr: Classe de performance du planeur: Classe 15 m; Classe 18 m; Classe 20 m; Classe Club; Classe Libre; Classe Sport; Classe Standard (15 m); Classe Biplace; Classe Ultra-léger; Classe Mondiale; Autre
de: Leistungsklasse des Segelflugzeugs: 15-m-Klasse; 18-m-Klasse; 20-m-Klasse; Clubklasse; Offene Klasse; Sportklasse; Standardklasse (15 m); Doppelsitzerklasse; Ultraleicht-Klasse; World-Klasse; Sonstige
en: Glider performance class: 15 m class; 18 m class; 20 m class; Club class; Open class; Sports class; Standard class (15 m); Two-seater class; Ultralight class; World class; Other
nb: Glider ytelseklasse: 15 m-klassen; 18 m-klassen; 20 m-klassen; Klubbklassen; Åpen klasse; Sportsklassen; Standardklassen (15 m); Toseterklassen; Ultralettklassen; Verdensklassen; Annet
th: คลาสประสิทธิภาพเครื่องร่อน: คลาส 15 ม.; คลาส 18 ม.; คลาส 20 ม.; คลาสคลับ; โอเพนคลาส; คลาสกีฬา; คลาสมาตรฐาน (15 ม.); คลาสที่นั่งคู่; คลาสอัลตราไลต์; เวิลด์คลาส; อื่นๆ
vi: Hạng hiệu suất tàu lượn: Hạng 15 m; Hạng 18 m; Hạng 20 m; Hạng Club; Hạng Mở; Hạng Thể thao; Hạng Tiêu chuẩn (15 m); Hạng Hai chỗ ngồi; Hạng Siêu nhẹ; Hạng Thế giới; Khác
es: Clase de rendimiento del planeador: Clase 15 m; Clase 18 m; Clase 20 m; Clase club; Clase abierta; Clase deportiva; Clase estándar (15 m); Clase biplaza; Clase ultraligera; Clase mundial; Otra
da: Svæveflyets ydeevneklasse: 15 m-klasse; 18 m-klasse; 20 m-klasse; Klubklasse; Åben klasse; Sportsklasse; Standardklasse (15 m); Tosædet klasse; Ultralet-klasse; Verdensklasse; Andet
nl: Zweefvliegtuig prestatieklasse: 15m-klasse; 18m-klasse; 20m-klasse; Clubklasse; Open klasse; Sportklasse; Standaardklasse (15 m); Tweezitterklasse; Ultralight-klasse; Worldklasse; Overig
sv: Prestandaklass för glidflygplan: 15 m-klass; 18 m-klass; 20 m-klass; Klubbklass; Öppen klass; Sportklass; Standardklass (15 m); Tvåsitsklass; Ultralätt klass; Världsklass; Övrigt
sk-SK: Trieda výkonnosti vetroňa: 15 m trieda; 18 m trieda; 20 m trieda; Klubová trieda; Otvorená trieda; Športová trieda; Štandardná trieda (15 m); Dvojsedadlová trieda; Ultraľahká trieda; Svetová trieda; Iné
bg-BG: Клас ефективност на планера: 15-метров клас; 18-метров клас; 20-метров клас; Клубен клас; Отворен клас; Спортен клас; Стандартен клас (15 м); Двуместен клас; Свръхлек клас; Световен клас; Друго
cs: Výkonnostní třída kluzáku: Třída 15 m; Třída 18 m; Třída 20 m; Klubová třída; Otevřená třída; Sportovní třída; Standardní třída (15 m); Dvousedadlová třída; Ultralehká třída; Světová třída; Ostatní